Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2699.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6341(f) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6341. Amendment or expunction of information.* * *(f) Notice of expunction.--Written notice of an expunction of any child abuse record made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be served upon the subject of the record who was responsible for the abuse or injury and the appropriate county agency. Except as provided in this subsection, the county agency, upon receipt of the notice, shall take appropriate, similar action in regard to the local child abuse records and inform, for the same purpose, the appropriate coroner if that 12345678910111213141516171819 officer has received reports pursuant to section 6367 (relating to reports to department and coroner or medical examiner). Whenever the county agency investigation reveals, within 60 days of receipt of the report of suspected child abuse, that the report is unfounded but that the subjects need services provided or arranged by the county agency, the county agency shall retain those records and shall specifically identify that the report was an unfounded report of suspected child abuse. An unfounded report regarding subjects who receive services shall be expunged no later than 120 days following the expiration of one year after the termination or completion of services provided or arranged by the county agency.* * *Section 2. Section 6365(d)(1) of Title 23 is amended and the subsection is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 6365. Services for prevention, investigation and treatment of child abuse.* * *(d) Child fatality or near fatality review team and written report.--(1) A child fatality or near fatality review team shall be convened by a county agency in accordance with a protocol developed by the county agency, the department and the district attorney in a case when a child dies or [nearly dies] suffers a near fatality as a result of child abuse as to which there is an indicated report or when the county agency has not made a status determination within 30 days. The team may convene after a county agency makes a determination of an indicated report and shall convene no later than 31 days from the receipt of the oral report to the 20260HB2699PN3771 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department of the suspected child abuse. A county agency in the county where the abuse occurred and in any county where the child resided within the 16 months preceding the fatality or near fatality shall convene a child fatality or near fatality review team. [A team shall consist of at least six individuals who are broadly representative of the county where the team is established and who have expertise in prevention and treatment of child abuse. With consideration given to the circumstances of each case and availability of individuals to serve as members, the team may consist of the following individuals:(i) A staff person from the county agency.(ii) A member of the advisory committee of the county agency.(iii) A health care professional.(iv) A representative of a local school, educational program or child care or early childhood development program.(v) A representative of law enforcement or the district attorney.(vi) An attorney-at-law trained in legal representation of children or an individual trained under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6342 (relating to court-appointed special advocates).(vii) A mental health professional.(viii) A representative of a children's advocacy center that provides services to children in the county. The individual under this subparagraph must not be an employee of the county agency.(ix) The county coroner or forensic pathologist.20260HB2699PN3771 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (x) A representative of a local domestic violence program.(xi) A representative of a local drug and alcohol program.(xii) An individual representing parents.(xiii) Any individual whom the county agency or child fatality or near fatality review team determines is necessary to assist the team in performing its duties.](1.1) A review team under paragraph (1) shall consist of the following:(i) At least six individuals who are broadly representative of the county where the team is established and who have expertise in prevention and treatment of child abuse.(ii) A staff person from the county agency.(iii) A regional office representative of the department.(iv) A health care professional.(v) A representative of law enforcement or the district attorney.(1.2) If the involvement, services or expertise of the following are applicable within a specific case, as determined by the chairperson, the review team under paragraph (1) may also consist of any of the following:(i) A representative of a local school, educational program or child care or early childhood development program of the abused child.(ii) The abused child's attorney, guardian ad litem or court-appointed special advocate under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6342 (relating to court-appointed special advocates).20260HB2699PN3771 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The abused child's mental health professional.(iv) The abused child's primary care provider.(v) The consulting child abuse pediatrician or other treating physician if no child abuse pediatrician is involved.(vi) A representative of the managed care organization serving the abused child.(vii) A mandated reporter who interacted with the abused child leading up to the incident.(viii) A representative of a children's advocacy center that provided services to the abused child. The individual under this subparagraph must not be an employee of the county agency.(ix) The county coroner, medical examiner or forensic pathologist when the review is a child fatality.(1.3) With consideration given to the circumstances of each case, including the abused child's age, services and other risk factors and the availability of individuals to serve as team members, the review team under paragraph (1) may also consist of voluntary team members. Following a recommendation by a team member, an invitation for participation in a review team under this subsection shall be determined by the chairperson based on the person's relevant expertise or involvement with the abused child or the child's family. Voluntary members may include:(i) A representative of the Department of Human Services' ChildLine.(ii) A representative of a local domestic violence program.(iii) A representative of a local drug and alcohol 20260HB2699PN3771 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program.(iv) A representative of the local health department.(v) A representative of the local community service provider.(vi) A representative of the local child death review team.(vii) A representative of emergency medical services.(viii) An in-home service provider, including early intervention, that has provided services to the abused child's family within the prior 16 months.(ix) An individual representing the abused child's parents.(x) A juvenile probation officer or county probation officer.(xi) A member of the advisory committee of the county agency.(xii) Any individual who the county agency or child fatality or near fatality review team determines is necessary to assist the team in performing its duties.* * *Section 3. Section 6367 of Title 23 is amended to read:§ 6367. Reports to department and coroner or medical examiner.(a) Reports to department.--Upon the receipt of each report of suspected child abuse made pursuant to this chapter, the county agency shall immediately transmit a child abuse report summary as provided in section 6313 (relating to reporting procedure) to the department. Supplemental reports shall be made at regular intervals thereafter in a manner and form the 20260HB2699PN3771 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department prescribes by regulation to the end that the department is kept fully informed and up-to-date concerning the status of reports of child abuse.(b) Reports to coroner.--(1) The county agency shall give telephone notice and forward immediately a copy of reports made pursuant to this chapter which involve the death of a child to the appropriate coroner or medical examiner pursuant to section 6317 (relating to mandatory reporting and postmortem investigation of deaths).(2) The county agency shall provide the appropriate coroner or medical examiner with any information relating to the reports made under this chapter that involves the death of a child that may assist the coroner or medical examiner in the investigation of the child's death.(c) Child deaths and near fatalities.--A county agency shall immediately provide information to the department regarding its involvement with the child and with the child's parent, guardian or custodian when a child dies or [nearly dies and child abuse is suspected.] suffers a near fatality as a result of suspected child abuse. The county agency shall inform the department of any history of child protective or general protective services provided to the child prior to the child's death or near fatality and of services provided to other children of the child's parent, guardian or custodian by the county agency or by court order. The county agency shall inform the department if the child was in the agency's custody at the time of the child's death or near fatality. The county agency shall provide this information in writing on forms provided by the department within 48 hours of the oral report.20260HB2699PN3771 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2699PN3771 - 8 - 1